Utah statutes.
51-5-2.   Legislative policy -- General requirements.
(1)  Each administrative unit of state government shall comply with this
chapter, which establishes the state's fiscal procedures for state government
funds.
(2)  Except when in conflict with constitutional and statutory provisions,
each administrative unit of state government shall apply generally accepted
accounting principles and fiscal procedures.
(3)  The Legislature may establish funds in addition to those required by the
Constitution.
(4)  Federal grants and other revenues, which must remain restricted according
to the terms under which they are received, are governed by the specific
provisions in this chapter.
(5)  The Division of Finance shall establish procedures applicable to the
administration and collection of taxes, licenses, fees, and all other forms of
revenue to allow them to be credited directly into the funds for which they
are designated.
(6)  The Division of Finance and each administrative unit of state government
shall account for general government revenues and functions in the
governmental funds.
(7)  The Legislature shall review all general governmental programs and
functions, regardless of the sources of revenue available to the various
departments, institutions, or agencies.
